Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
PART 2
MOTOR CARRIERS OF PASSENGERS -
COMMON CARRIERS AND CONTRACT CARRIERS

40-10.1-201. Certificate required.

A person shall not operate or offer to operate as a common carrier in intrastate commerce without first having obtained from the commission a certificate declaring that the present or future public convenience and necessity requires or will require such operation.

The fact that a person carries on operations, in whole or in part, between substantially fixed points or over established routes, or under contracts with more than one person, or by making repeated or periodic trips is prima facie evidence that the person is a common carrier and subject to this part 2 and part 1 of this article.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 405, § 1, effective August 10.

40-10.1-202. Permit required - legislative declaration.

A person shall not operate or offer to operate as a contract carrier in intrastate commerce without first obtaining a permit for such operation from the commission. As used in this part 2, "permit" does not include a permit under part 3, 4, or 5 of this article.

The general assembly hereby declares that the business of contract carriers is affected with a public interest and that the safety and welfare of the public traveling upon the highways, the preservation and maintenance of the highways, and the proper regulation of common carriers using the highways require the regulation of contract carriers to the extent provided in this article, for which purposes the commission is vested with the authority to issue a permit to a contract carrier and may attach to such permit and to the exercise of the rights and privileges granted by the permit such terms and conditions as are reasonable.

No permit, nor any extension or enlargement of an existing permit, shall be granted by the commission if, in the commission's judgment, the proposed operation of any such contract carrier will impair the efficient public service of any authorized common carrier then adequately serving the same territory over the same general highway route. The commission shall give written notice of any application for a permit to all persons interested in or affected by the issuance of the permit or any extension or enlargement thereof, pursuant to section 40-6-108 (2).

Nothing contained in this article compels a contract carrier to be or become a common carrier or subjects a contract carrier to the laws or liability applicable to a common carrier.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 406, § 1, effective August 10.

40-10.1-203. Rules for issuance of certificate - standing to protest - judicial review - legislative declaration.

The commission has the power to issue a certificate to a common carrier or to issue it for the partial exercise only of the privilege sought, and may attach to the exercise of the rights granted by the certificate such terms and conditions as, in the commission's judgment, the public convenience and necessity may require.

The granting of a certificate to operate a taxicab service within and between counties with a population of less than seventy thousand, based on the most recent available federal census figures, is governed by the doctrine of regulated monopoly.

The granting of a certificate to operate a taxicab service within and between those counties with a population of seventy thousand or greater that are not served by a large-market taxicab service pursuant to part 7 of this article 10.1, based on the most recent available federal census figures, is not an exclusive grant or monopoly, and the doctrine of regulated competition applies.

The general assembly finds, determines, and declares that nothing in this subsection (2) requires or prohibits a taxicab company applying for a certificate to form a labor union nor requires any taxicab driver to join a labor union.

Repealed.
(c) (I) (A) Repealed.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, the holder of a certificate of public convenience and necessity that contains authority to operate as a taxicab between points within the state of Colorado shall also be deemed to hold taxicab authority to pick up passengers from any point in the state of Colorado and transport the passengers back to the certificate holder's authorized area when the certificate holder has dropped off passengers in close proximity to that point. The provisions of this sub-subparagraph (B) do not apply when a taxicab drops off a passenger at any airport in this state.

The holder of a certificate that contains authority to operate a taxicab service to points in the city and county of Denver also holds taxicab service authority from points in the city and county of Denver to all points within the common carrier's base area, defined as that geographic area in which such common carrier may provide point-to-point taxicab service.

The commission shall amend, by order and without notice or hearing, any existing taxicab service certificate by removing all language authorizing large-market taxicab service offered in accordance with part 7 of this article 10.1.

When a request for reconsideration of a written recommended decision under this section has been made by filing exceptions pursuant to section 40-6-109 and the commission has rendered a final decision on the exceptions as provided in article 6 of this title 40, any party to the proceeding may, within thirty days after the final decision, apply directly to a district court in this state for judicial review pursuant to section 40-6-115. For purposes of judicial review, a decision of the commission on exceptions is final on the date the decision is served on the parties to the proceeding.

Source:

L. 2011:

(2)(c)(I) amended, (SB 11-180), ch. 249, p. 1085, § 1, effective June 2; entire article added, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 406, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2015:

(2)(b)(II) amended, (HB 15-1316), ch. 339, p. 1376, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2018:

(2)(b), (2)(c)(III), and (3) amended and (2)(c)(I)(A) repealed, (HB 18-1320), ch. 363, p. 2166, § 9, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2)(c)(I) was numbered as § 40-10-105 (2)(d)(I) in Senate Bill 11-180 (see L. 2011, p. 1085). That provision was harmonized with subsection (2)(c)(I) as it appears in House Bill 11-1198.

40-10.1-204. Temporary authority.

To enable the provision of common carrier or contract carrier service for which there appears to be an immediate and urgent need to any point or within a territory having no such service capable of meeting the need, the commission may, in its discretion and without hearings or other proceedings, grant temporary authority for such service by a common carrier or a contract carrier, as the case may be. Such temporary authority, unless suspended or revoked for good cause, is valid for such time as the commission specifies, but for not more than an aggregate of one hundred eighty days, unless for good cause shown the commission extends the temporary authority for a period which may extend until a final administrative decision is rendered. A grant of temporary authority or an extension thereof creates no presumption that corresponding permanent authority will be granted thereafter.

Pending the determination of an application filed with the commission for approval of an acquisition of stock of a common carrier or contract carrier, a consolidation or merger of two or more such carriers, or a purchase, lease, or contract to operate the properties of one or more such carriers, the commission may, in its discretion and without hearings or other proceedings, grant temporary approval for a period not exceeding one hundred eighty days for the operation of the carrier or its properties sought to be acquired by the person proposing in such pending application to acquire the properties or stock, if it appears that failure to grant such temporary approval may result in destruction of or injury to the carrier or its properties sought to be acquired, or may interfere substantially with their future usefulness in the performance of adequate and continuous service to the public. For good cause shown, the commission may extend such temporary approval for a period which may extend until a final administrative decision is rendered. Temporary approval or an extension thereof does not create a presumption that the application will be granted.

Common carrier or contract carrier service rendered under temporary authority or approval is subject to all applicable provisions of this title and to the rules and requirements of the commission. The maximum time period of any temporary authority or approval is not subject to extension or renewal.

The commission shall not issue a temporary authority or approval unless, under such general rules as the commission may prescribe governing the application and notice thereof to interested or affected common carriers, all interested or affected carriers have been given at least five days' notice of the filing of the application and an opportunity to protest the granting thereof. If the commission determines that an emergency exists, it may issue temporary authority or approval at once by making specific reference in its order to the circumstances constituting the emergency, in which case no notice need be given, but any such emergency authority or approval expires no later than thirty days after it was issued.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 407, § 1, effective August 10.

40-10.1-205. Transfer of certificate or permit.

A certificate or permit, or rights obtained under a certificate or permit, that are held, owned, or obtained by any common carrier or contract carrier may be sold, assigned, leased, encumbered, or transferred as other property, subject to prior authorization by the commission.

Absent other facts, the fact that a common carrier or contract carrier conducts operations with independent contractors does not in and of itself constitute a lease or transfer of the certificate.

An existing certificate or permit shall not be transferred unless the fitness of the transferee is established to the satisfaction of the commission.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 408, § 1, effective August 10.

40-10.1-206. Rates - limitations.

It is unlawful for any common carrier to carry or advertise that it will carry any individuals at rates different from those it has on file with the commission for such carriage.

A contract carrier shall not destroy or impair, through discrimination or unfair competition, the service or business of any common carrier or the integrity of the state's regulation of any such service or business; and to that end, the commission is authorized and directed to prescribe minimum rates, fares, and charges to be collected by contract carriers when competing with duly authorized common carriers, which rates, fares, and charges must not be less than the rates prescribed for common carriers for substantially the same or similar service.

In accordance with this article and such rules as the commission may prescribe, every contract carrier subject to this article shall file with the commission, within such time and in such form as the commission may designate, and shall keep on file with the commission, at all times, schedules showing rates, charges, and collections, collected or enforced or to be collected or enforced, that in any manner affect or relate to the operations of any such contract carrier; and the commission has full power to change, amend, or alter any such tariff or, after hearing, fix the rates of any contract carrier subject to this article that competes with a common carrier.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 409, § 1, effective August 10.

40-10.1-207. Taxicab license plates - rules.

The commission shall either:

Create a document that a person authorized to provide taxicab services under this article may use to verify to the department of revenue or the department's authorized agent that the person is so authorized; or

Create a system to electronically verify to the department of revenue or the department's authorized agent that the person is authorized to provide taxicab services under this part 2.

Upon request, the commission shall provide the document to the person with such authority or the electronic verification to the department of revenue or the department's authorized agent.

The commission may promulgate rules to implement this section and to enforce section 42-3-236, C.R.S.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire section added, (HB 11-1234), ch. 142, p. 496, § 4, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3)(b) provided for the repeal of subsection (3), effective July 1, 2012. (See L. 2011, p. 496.)